Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 2. Science, Technology and Energy Authority

Editor's notes. —

This article, which derived from Laws 1987 ch. 100, § 1, related to the Science, Technology and Energy Authority.

§§ 9-7-201 through 9-7-219.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 6, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1998, ch. 6, § 5 repealed §§

9-7-201

through 9-7-219, thereby repealing all sections in the article. Laws 1998, ch. 34, § 1, amended §§ 9-7-202 and 9-7-203 but, because of the repeal by ch. 6, § 5, the amendments by ch. 34 were never given effect, and 9-7-202 and 9-7-203 are set out as repealed, effective July 1, 1998.

These sections, which derived from Laws 1987, ch. 100, § 1, related to the science, technology and energy authority.

§ 9-7-220.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1988, ch. 91, § 2.